Louisiana, session 2026, SB109.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1133.3(B)(1)(a), (b), and (d) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1133.3. Louisiana Emergency Medical Services Commission; creation;
membership; qualifications; terms; vacancies; meetings; officers;
compensation; domicile
* * *
B.(1) The commission shall be composed of twelve voting members
appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) Two emergency medical services administrators, including one
representing the private sector and one representing the public sector, nominated by
the Louisiana Ambulance Alliance.
(b) Two licensed paramedics and one licensed emergency medical technician
who are approved as emergency medical services educators by the bureau. At least
one of the members as provided in this Subparagraph shall be appointed by the
Louisiana Fire Chiefs Association.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 109 ENROLLED
(d) One member who is, at a minimum, a state-certified state-licensed
emergency medical technician nominated by the Louisiana Municipal Association.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.